pt-BR: Velocímetro display tipo: Analógico; Digital; Híbrido; Outros
hu: Sebességmérő kijelzőjének típusa: Analóg; Digitális; Hibrid; Egyéb
cs: Typ zobrazení tachometru: Analogový; Digitální; Hybridní; Jiné
ro-RO: Tip de afișaj pentru vitezometru: Analogic; Digital; Hibrid; Altele
sk-SK: Typ zobrazenia tachometra: Analógový; Digitálny; Hybridný; Iný
ja: スピードメーター表示タイプ: アナログ; デジタル; ハイブリッド; その他
fi: Nopeusmittarin näyttötyyppi: Analoginen; Digitaalinen; Hybridi; Muu
da: Displaytype for speedometer: Analog; Digital; Hybrid; Andet
fr: Type d’affichage du compteur de vitesse: Analogique; Numérique; Hybride; Autre
es: Tipo de visualización del velocímetro: Analógico; Digital; Híbrido; Otro
zh-TW: 速度計顯示類型: 類比; 數位; 混合; 其他
en: Speedometer display type: Analog; Digital; Hybrid; Other
bg-BG: Тип дисплей на скоростомера: Аналогов; Цифров; Хибриден; Друго
sl-SI: Vrsta zaslona merilnika hitrosti: Analogni; Digitalni; Hibridni; Drugo
th: ประเภทการแสดงผลมาตรวัดความเร็ว: อนาล็อก; ดิจิทัล; ไฮบริด; อื่นๆ
nl: Snelheidsmeter displaytype: Analoog; Digitaal; Hybride; Overige
ru: Тип отображения спидометра: Аналоговый; Цифровой; Гибридный; Другое
it: Tipo di display del tachimetro: Analogico; Digitale; Ibrido; Altro
lt-LT: Spidometro rodymo tipas: Analoginis; Skaitmeninis; Hibridinis; Kita
zh-CN: 速度表显示类型: 模拟; 数字; 混合; 其他
pl: Typ wyświetlacza prędkościomierza: Analogowy; Cyfrowy; Hybrydowy; Inne
sv: Hastighetsmätarens displaytyp: Analog; Digital; Hybrid; Annat
de: Art der Tachometeranzeige: Analog; Digital; Hybrid; Sonstige
nb: Speedometervisningstype: Analog; Digital; Hybrid; Annet
hr-HR: Vrsta prikaza brzinomjera: Analogno; Digitalno; Hibridno; Ostalo
tr: Hız göstergesi ekran tipi: Analog; Dijital; Hibrit; Diğer
ko: 속도계 표시 유형: 아날로그; 디지털; 하이브리드; 기타
pt-PT: Tipo de visor do velocímetro: Analógico; Digital; Híbrido; Outro
vi: Loại hiển thị đồng hồ tốc độ: Analog; Kỹ thuật số; Lai; Khác
el: Τύπος ένδειξης ταχύμετρου: Αναλογική; Ψηφιακή; Υβριδική; Άλλο